Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-2102
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the public has an interest in the uninterrupted generation and transmission of electricity by public power suppliers in this state. The Legislature finds that it is in the public interest to protect facilities and infrastructure used in the generation, transmission, and distribution of electricity from damage as a result of knowingly unlawful and malicious acts.

Laws 2009, LB238, § 4.
May 27, 2009